Utah statutes.
62A-5b-105.   Policy of state to employ persons with a disability.

It is the policy of this state that a person with a disability shall be employed in the state service, the service of the political subdivisions of the state, in the public schools, and in all other employment supported in whole or in part by public funds on the same terms and conditions as a person who is not a person with a disability, unless it is shown that the particular disability prevents the performance of the work involved.

